Maryland, session 2025, SB0332.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Task Force to Study the Premature Retirement of Electricity
Generation Facilities.
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) the Secretary of the Environment, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Chair of the Public Service Commission, or the Chair’s designee;
and
(5) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) one representative of PJM Interconnection;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0332*

SENATE BILL 332
(ii) one representative of the Independent Market Monitor for the
PJM Region;
(iii) one representative of the Reliability First Corporation;
(iv) one individual with professional expertise in the traditional
power generation industry; and
(iv) one individual with professional expertise in the renewable
energy industry.
(c) The Chair of the Public Service Commission shall serve as the chair of the
Task Force.
(d) The Public Service Commission shall provide staff for the Task Force.
(e) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Task Force shall:
(1) (i) assess the cost savings for customers that results from the
retirement of electricity generation facilities;
(ii) evaluate the impact that the premature retirement of electricity
generation facilities has on the reliable energy supply for customers;
(iii) evaluate the environmental impact of the premature retirement
of electricity generation facilities, including consideration of habitat disruption, wildlife
impact, watershed stress, and ecological harm;
(iv) examine potential nationwide consequences of shortages in
reliable or dispatchable electricity if a Maryland electricity generating facility retires
prematurely;
(v) examine the economic challenges faced by electricity generating
companies, which have led to premature retirement of electricity generating facilities, and
evaluate potential mitigations to sustain their operations;
(vi) facilitate collaboration among stakeholders, including utilities,
environmental advocacy groups, energy consumers, and industry representatives; and

SENATE BILL 332 3
(vii) conduct an infrastructure transition analysis that ensures that
infrastructure developments align with the practical needs of electricity generating
companies; and
(2) make recommendations:
(i) to address challenges and enhance decision making regarding
the premature retirement of electricity generation facilities; and
(ii) that include energy reliability solutions that address the
imminent energy reliability gap and balance the need between economic considerations and
the State’s commitment to cleaner energy goals.
(g) On or before January 1, 2026, the Task Force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly, the Senate Committee on Education, Energy
and the Environment, and the House Economic Matters Committee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2026, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.